Washington statutes.
RCW 18.108.115

Persons licensed under prior law.

Any person holding a valid license to practice massage issued by authority of the state on July 26, 1987, shall continue to be licensed as a massage therapist under the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2016 c 41 s 10; 1987 c 443 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 c 41: See note following RCW 18.108.010.